Rhode Island, session 2025, SB138.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-47-3.1 and 11-47-5.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47
entitled "Weapons" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-3.1. Carrying a stolen firearm when committing a crime of violence.
No person shall commit a crime of violence when armed with or having available a stolen
firearm. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished: (1) for the first
conviction by imprisonment for not less than five (5) ten (10) nor more than fifteen (15) twenty
(20) years and must serve at least five (5) years without the eligibility for parole or probation; (2)
for a second conviction under this section by imprisonment for not less than fifteen (15) nor more
than twenty (20) twenty-five (25) years and must serve at least ten (10) years without the eligibility
for parole or probation; and (3) for a third or subsequent conviction under this section by
imprisonment for not less than twenty (20) twenty-five (25) years and may be imprisoned for life
and must serve at least fifteen (15) years without the eligibility for parole or probation. The sentence
imposed shall be consecutive to the underlying sentence for the crime of violence.
11-47-5.2. Possession of a stolen firearm.
It shall be unlawful for any person to possess a stolen firearm, knowing it to be stolen. Any
person in violation of this section shall be guilty of a felony and subject to imprisonment for not
less than three (3) five (5) years nor more than fifteen (15) twenty (20) years. Any person convicted
under this section who is a first offender shall serve at least three (3) years without the eligibility
for parole or probation and any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense shall serve at

least ten (10) years without the eligibility for parole or probation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000492
========
LC000492 - Page 2 of 3